North Carolina, session 2025, HB466.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-63(b1) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"() Birthplace of American Independence."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-79.4(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
() Birthplace of American Independence. – Issuable to a registered owner of a
motor vehicle. The plate shall have a blue background and bear a logo with a
feather pen and the phrase "Birthplace of American Independence" with red
and white lettering and a design commemorating the 250th anniversary of the
signing of the Halifax Resolves in Halifax, North Carolina, on April 12, 1776.
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-79.7(a1) reads as rewritten:
"(a1) Fees. – All other special registration plates are subject to the regular motor vehicle
registration fee in G.S. 20-87 or G.S. 20-88 plus an additional fee in the following amount:

Special Plate Additional Fee Amount
…
Big Rock Blue Marlin Tournament $30.00
Birthplace of American Independence $30.00
Boy Scouts of America Expired July 1, 2016
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 20-79.7(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Distribution of Fees. – The Special Registration Plate Account and the Collegiate and
Cultural Attraction Plate Account are established within the Highway Fund. The Division must
credit the additional fee imposed for the special registration plates listed in subsection (a1) of this
section among the Special Registration Plate Account (SRPA), the Collegiate and Cultural
Attraction Plate Account (CCAPA), the North Carolina Land and Water Fund (NCLWF), which
is established under G.S. 143B-135.234, and the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, which is
established under G.S. 143B-135.56, as follows:

*H466-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Special Plate SRPA CCAPA NCLWF PRTF
…
Big Rock Blue Marlin
Tournament $10 $20 0 0
Birthplace of American
Independence $10 $20 0 0
Boy Scouts of America
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 20-81.12 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"() Birthplace of American Independence. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the
money in the Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of
"Birthplace of American Independence" plates to Halifax County Business Horizons, Inc., to
support commemorative and educational activities in conjunction with the 250th anniversary of
the signing of the Halifax Resolves."
SECTION 6. The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to alphabetize, number, and
renumber the special registration plates listed in G.S. 20-63(b1), 20-79.4(b), 20-79.7(a1) and (b),
and 20-81.12 to ensure that all the special registration plates are listed in alphabetical order and
numbered accordingly.
SECTION 7. This act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 466-First Edition